Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0594.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6. (1) The commission shall do all of the following: (a) Subject to subsection subsections (2) and (3), operate and manage the Michigan state capitol historic site. (b) Maintain and restore the state capitol building. (c) Maintain and improve the grounds of the Michigan state capitol historic site. (d) Appoint an individual to manage the day-to-day operations of the Michigan state capitol historic site. The individual appointed under this subdivision is an at-will employee and shall serve serves at the pleasure of the commission. (e) Employ staff to carry out the commission's responsibilities under this subsection (1) and as otherwise provided by law. All individuals employed by the commission are nontenured, at-will employees. The commission may discipline, transfer, demote, suspend, or summarily discharge an employee. (f) Contract with any person for purposes of procuring to procure goods or services or otherwise carrying carry out the commission's responsibilities with regard to the Michigan state capitol historic site. (g) Make recommendations to the governor, the senate, and the house of representatives regarding funding for the Michigan state capitol historic site, including, but not limited to, funding from the fund. (h) Carry out other responsibilities as provided by law. (2) The commission does not have authority and shall not exercise control over the internal decisions of the senate or the house of representatives related to the allocation of space in the state capitol building or the state capitol building parking lot, including legislative or staff offices. All decisions concerning space in the state capitol building and the state capitol building parking lot shall must be made according to the rules or practices of the senate and the house of representatives. (3) The commission shall not prevent an individual licensed by this state or another state to carry a concealed pistol from carrying a concealed pistol in the state capitol building. An individual licensed by this state or another state to carry a concealed pistol who is carrying a concealed pistol in the state capitol building shall, if requested, present the individual's concealed pistol license to any of the following: (a) A capitol security officer of the department of state police. (b) A sergeant at arms or assistant sergeant at arms of the senate or house of representatives.